Nevada, session 83, SB365.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 7 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 7.095 and 228.1116,
an attorney shall not contract for or collect a fee contingent on the
amount of recovery for representing a person seeking damages in
a civil action in excess of 20 percent of the amount recovered.
2. The limitation set forth in subsection 1 applies to all forms
of recovery, including, without limitation, settlement, arbitration
and judgment.
3. As used in this section, “recovered” means the net sum of
money recovered by the plaintiff after deducting any
disbursements or costs incurred in connection with the
prosecution or settlement of the claim.
Sec. 2. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to any
contract entered into on or after October 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB365*